Nebraska, session 109, LB974.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB974 LB974
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2027:
(a) For single taxpayers, married filing separate taxpayers, or
estates and trusts, the following excise tax is levied on each dollar of
individual income above $1,000,000: 9.5%, less the applicable individual
income tax rate in section 77-2715.03 for such individual income over
$1,000,000;
(b) For married filing jointly taxpayers or head of household
taxpayers, the following excise tax is levied on each dollar of
individual income above $2,000,000: 9.5% less the applicable individual
income tax rate in section 77-2715.03 for such individual income over
$2,000,000.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall collect the excise tax levied
under this section at least once per taxable year on a form and in a
manner prescribed by the department.
(b) The department shall remit any excise tax collected under this
section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Tax Equity Cash Fund.
Sec. 2. (1) The Tax Equity Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the Department of Revenue. The fund shall consist of
money credited to the fund pursuant to section 1 of this act. The
department may use money in the fund to pay for costs associated with any
duty of the department under section 1 of this act and for administration
of the fund.
(2) Money in the Tax Equity Cash Fund may be transferred as approved
by the Legislature to the:
(a) General Fund;
(b) Education Future Fund; or
(c) Property Tax Credit Cash Fund.
(3) Any money in the Tax Equity Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
-2-

LB974 LB974
2026 2026
Act.
-3-